Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-346
Aborted infant; experimentation; prohibited; exception; penalty.

No person shall knowingly, intentionally, or willfully use any premature infant aborted alive for any type of scientific, research, laboratory, or other kind of experimentation except as necessary to protect or preserve the life or health of such premature infant aborted alive. Violation of this section is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1979, LB 316, § 11.